Arkansas, session 2025, SB491.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 21-5-404(10), concerning the powers,
functions, and duties of the State Board of Finance concerning contracts with
qualified vendors, is amended to read as follows:
(10)(A) To direct the office to contract with qualified vendors,
as defined by the board, offering the plan options under the program as
prescribed by the board without regard to § 19-11-228 or other statutes
requiring competitive bidding.
(B) Each contract shall:
(i) be Be for a term of at least one (1) year but
may be made automatically renewable from term to term in the absence of
*ANS402*
04-15-2025 09:15:44 ANS402

As Engrossed: H4/15/25 SB491
notice of termination by either party; and
(ii) Require a qualified vendor to agree to
verification of the vendor's data under § 21-5-425; and

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 21, Chapter 5, Subchapter 4, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
21-5-425. Verification of data of vendor — Independent audit process —
Civil penalty — Rules.
(a) A vendor that contracts with the Employee Benefits Division under
this subchapter and a fiscal impact is required shall agree to verify the
accuracy of the data the vendor provides to the state.
(b) The division shall not contract with a vendor for services for the
division that does not agree to submit to an independent audit process to
verify the accuracy of the vendor's data.
(c) The Director of the Employee Benefits Division:
(1) Shall develop an independent audit process to verify the
accuracy of the data a vendor provides to the state; and
(2) May request a vendor submit to an independent audit process.
(d) A vendor that is found through the independent audit process under
subdivision (c)(2) of this section to have provided inaccurate data to the
state is subject to:
(1) A civil penalty of:
(A) Five hundred dollars ($500) for a first violation; and
(B) One thousand dollars ($1,000) for each subsequent
violation; and
(2) Loss of licensure or authorization to operate in this state.
(e) The director shall promulgate rules to implement this section.

SECTION 3. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that using accurate data is
indispensable when considering the fiscal impact of legislation for this
state; that vendors may not provide accurate data and the state needs an
independent audit process to enable the state to verify the accuracy of
vendor data; and that this act is immediately necessary because it is vital
to know the fiscal impact of the passage of legislation to protect the
residents of this state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and
04-15-2025 09:15:44 ANS402

As Engrossed: H4/15/25 SB491
this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public
peace, health, and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/K. Hammer


























04-15-2025 09:15:44 ANS402